Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-417
Department of Correctional Services; employees; certain acts prohibited; violation; penalty.

Any person who purposely or knowingly allows any committed offender to escape or, without the approval of the chief executive officer of the facility, allows any offender to be visited, conversed with, comforted, or relieved or conveys to or from any committed offender any communication or article shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1897, c. 75, § 31, p. 340;

R.S.1913, § 7335;

C.S.1922, § 6995;

C.S.1929, § 83-932;

R.S.1943, § 83-417;

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 77, p. 3110;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 313.

Officer voluntarily permitting prisoner to escape, penalty for, see section 28-912.

Court surmised it doubtful this section was designed to reach transactions between or among inmates, but rather, between civilians and inmates. Sell v. Parratt, 548 F.2d 753 (8th Cir. 1977).